Utah statutes.
73-2-1.5.   Procedures -- Adjudicative proceedings.

Except as provided in Sections 63G-4-102 and 73-2-25, the state engineer and the Division of Water Rights shall comply with the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, in their adjudicative proceedings.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

